California statutes. Education Code
(b) If there are program spaces available after students have enrolled, a California veterinary medical school that offers a certification program pursuant to subdivision (a) shall allow California-licensed veterinarians and California-registered veterinary technicians to enroll in the certification program for continuing education and certification purposes.

(1) A veterinary medical school that offers a certification program pursuant to this section shall provide a California-licensed veterinarian or California-registered veterinary technician who successfully completes the certification program with a certificate of completion and a written confirmation of the number of hours spent in active
 high-quality, high-volume spay and neuter practice.

(2) A California-licensed veterinarian or California-registered veterinary technician who successfully completes the certification program shall receive continuing education credit for program participation.

(3) The curriculum offered to a California-registered veterinary technician pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with current law and shall include, among other topics, all of the following:

(A) Surgical preparation of the patient.

(B) Anesthesia induction and maintenance.

(C) Subcutaneous and cutaneous tissue closure.

(D) Anesthesia recovery.

(E) Emergency and critical care considerations using techniques under the high-quality, high-volume spay and neuter model.

(4) A certification program offered pursuant to this subdivision shall require a California-licensed veterinarian to successfully complete a number of ovariectomies, ovariohysterectomies, and gonadectomies under the high-quality, high-volume spay and neuter model, as determined by the program.

(5) A certification program offered pursuant to this subdivision may charge a reasonable fee to cover the costs associated with offering the program to a California-licensed veterinarian or a California-registered veterinary technician. A fee charged pursuant to this paragraph shall be paid directly to the veterinary medical school offering the program.

(c) A certification program offered pursuant to this section shall do all of the following:

(1) Make available to the public low- or no-cost ovariectomies, ovariohysterectomies, or gonadectomies for cats and dogs that are performed by students or California-licensed veterinarians enrolled in the program.

(2) Develop policies and procedures that prioritize qualifying for the services described in paragraph (1) based on, at a minimum, income and socioeconomic status.

(3) Ensure that the training and care provided or coordinated by the program is at a standard of care that is consistent with those standards of care generally accepted within the veterinary profession.

(d) A California veterinary
 medical school that offers a certification program pursuant to this section shall publicly publish, every three years, a progress report that describes the activities of the program. The progress report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) The number of cat and dog ovariectomies, ovariohysterectomies, and gonadectomies performed under the program.

(2) The number of certifications issued by the program.

(3) The costs associated with implementing and administering the program.

(4) The subsidized cost, if any, of surgical services provided to the public pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) A California veterinary medical school that offers a certification
 program pursuant to this section shall determine the best available location or locations to host the program including, but not limited to, any of the following locations:

(1) On-campus facilities.

(2) A public animal control agency or shelter.

(3) A society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter.

(4) A humane society shelter.

(5) A rescue group shelter.

(f) This section shall not authorize a California-registered veterinary technician to perform surgical procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 613, Sec. 1.   (SB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Higher Education Accountability Program [99180. - 99182.]

99180.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that demonstrable improvements in student knowledge, capacities, and skills between entrance and graduation be publicly announced and available, and that these improvements be achieved efficiently through the effective use of student and institutional resources of time, effort, and money. 

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that public and private institutions of higher education express expectations of student performance in a manner that is clear to students. 

(c) It is further the intent of the Legislature that existing accountability requirements be strengthened through the elimination of unnecessary and redundant reports submitted by the educational institutions to various state agencies. The elimination of these unnecessary reports will save money and allow the institutions to focus their efforts on only the most important reporting requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 741, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

99181.

The University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges shall each prepare a list of reports required to be submitted on a regular basis to the Legislature and to state agencies. The purpose of each report shall be identified, as well as the costs associated with production of the report. Prior to March 1, 1992, this information shall be submitted to the education policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, the Department of Finance, and the California Postsecondary Education Commission. The California Postsecondary Education Commission shall review and comment on the utility of the required reports identified by the educational institutions, and offer recommendations for consolidating or eliminating existing reporting requirements in order to reduce operating expenses and streamline reporting provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 741, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

99182.

(a) On or before November 15, 1994, and each November 15 thereafter, the California Postsecondary Education Commission shall submit a higher education report to the Legislature and the Governor which provides information to the citizens of the state on the significant indicators of performance of the public colleges and universities. This annual report shall be presented in a readable format. Prior to publication, the commission shall distribute a draft of the report to all public colleges and universities for comment. 

(b) The commission, in cooperation with the public colleges and universities, shall develop and adopt a format for the higher education report specified in subdivision (a) and the information to be included. The following types of information shall be considered for inclusion in the report with respect to public universities: 

(1) The retention rate of students. 

(2) The proportion of lower division instructional courses taught by tenured and tenure-track faculty. 

(3) The minimum number of hours per semester required to be spent by faculty in student advisement. 

(4) The proportion of graduate and undergraduate students participating in sponsored research programs. 

(5) Placement data on graduates. 

(6) The proportional changes in the participation and graduation rates of students from groups historically underrepresented in higher education. 

(7) The proportion of graduate students who received undergraduate degrees (A) at the institution, (B) within the state, (C) within the United States, and (D) from other nations. 

(8) The number of full-time students who have transferred from a California community college. 

(9) Demonstrable evidence of improvements in student knowledge, capacities, and skills between entrance and graduation, where this evidence exists. 

(10) Results of surveys of students regarding student attitudes and experiences, where these surveys exist. 

(c) The following types of information shall be considered for inclusion in the report with respect to public community colleges: 

(1) The retention rate of students. 

(2) The proportion of remedial or developmental education courses taught by full-time faculty. 

(3) The number of hours per student per semester spent by faculty in student advisement. 

(4) Placement data on graduates. 

(5) The proportional change in the participation and graduation rate of students from groups historically underrepresented in higher education. 

(6) The number of students who have transferred into a four-year, postsecondary institution, by ethnicity and gender. 

(7) Demonstrable evidence of improvements in student knowledge, capacities, and skills between entrance and graduation, where this evidence exists. 

(8) Results of surveys of students regarding student attitudes and experiences, where these surveys exist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 741, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Instructional Strategies [99200. - 99227.]



  ARTICLE 1. Subject Matter Projects [99200. - 99204.]

99200.

(a) With funds appropriated therefor, and with the approval of the Concurrence Committee, the Regents of the University of California are requested to establish and maintain cooperative endeavors designed to accomplish the following:

(1) Develop and enhance teachers’ subject matter and content knowledge in the subject matter areas specified in Section 99201.

(2) Develop and enhance teachers’ instructional strategies to improve pupil learning and academic performance as measured against State Board of Education standards adopted pursuant to Sections 60605 and 60605.8 and, where applicable, to standards adopted pursuant to Section 60811 and any subsequently adopted standards.

(3) Provide teachers with instructional strategies for working with English learners.

(4) Provide teachers with instructional strategies for delivering career-oriented, integrated academic and technical content in a manner that is linked to high priority industry sectors identified in the California career technical education model curriculum standards as adopted by the State Board of Education. The Concurrence Committee, in consultation with the appropriate state entities, industry leaders, representatives of organized labor, educators, and other parties, shall determine the priority of industry sectors.

(5) Provide teachers with access to and opportunity to examine current research that is demonstrably linked to improved pupil learning and achievement as measured by performance levels on state tests administered
 pursuant to Section 60605, or any successor assessment system, or on English language development assessments developed, pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60810) of Part 33 of Division 4 of Title 2, or any successor assessments, for English language learners.

(6) Maintain subject-specific professional communities that create and encourage ongoing opportunities for teacher collaboration, learning, and research.

(7) Develop and deploy as teacher leaders, teachers with demonstrated levels of expertise in the classroom and certifiable levels of content knowledge.

(8) Provide teachers with instructional strategies for ongoing collaboration on the delivery of career-oriented, integrated academic and technical content.

(9) Address learning loss in
 mathematics, science, and English, language arts due to the COVID-19 pandemic.

(b) The duties of the Concurrence Committee shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Ensuring that the statewide and local subject matter projects comply with requirements of this chapter.

(2) Developing rules and regulations for the statewide subject matter projects.

(3) On or before January 1, 2024, providing a report on addressing learning loss in the mathematics, science, writing, and reading and literature projects specified in Section 99201 to the Governor and to appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature. The report shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following information, compiled for a three-year
 period:

(A) The number, and level of experience, of participants in the mathematics, science, writing, and reading and literature projects that are specifically focused on addressing learning loss in mathematics, science, and English, language arts due to the COVID-19 pandemic.

(B) The total amount of funds expended, on an annual basis that are specifically focused on addressing learning loss in mathematics, science, and English, language arts due to the COVID-19 pandemic, for the mathematics, science, writing, and reading and literature projects.

(C) An explanation of the type of professional development activities offered pursuant to the mathematics, science, writing, and reading and literature projects to address learning loss in mathematics, science, and English, language arts due to the COVID-19 pandemic,
 including the extent to which teachers were provided professional development focused on delivering career-oriented, integrated academic and technical content.

(D) A list of the name and location of each school affiliated with the mathematics, science, writing, and reading and literature projects that are specifically focused on addressing learning loss in mathematics, science, and English, language arts due to the COVID-19 pandemic.

(c) Grants to establish local sites of statewide subject matter projects shall be available to institutions of higher education, county offices of education and school districts, or any combination thereof, with a subject matter proposal approved pursuant to this article. Once established, each subject matter project shall be administered by the University of California in cooperation with the Concurrence Committee. Local sites of statewide subject
 matter projects shall be distributed throughout the state so that elementary, secondary, and postsecondary school personnel located in rural, urban, and suburban areas may avail themselves of subject matter projects.

(d) The Concurrence Committee shall be composed of individuals who are affiliated with leadership, management, or instruction in education or education policy entities, including educational expertise on instructional strategies for English learners and academic language acquisition. They shall be selected as follows:

(1) One representative selected by the Regents of the University of California.

(2) One representative selected by the Board of Trustees of the California State University.

(3) One representative selected by the State Board of
 Education, who has significant experience with direct classroom instruction.

(4) One representative selected by the Governor.

(5) One representative selected by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(6) One representative selected by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(7) One representative selected by the Curriculum Development and Supplemental Materials Commission.

(8) One representative of the California Community Colleges selected by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(9) One representative of an independent postsecondary institution selected by the Association of Independent California
 Colleges and Universities.

(e) (1) The requirement for submitting a report pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) is inoperative on January 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) shall be in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 25, Sec. 16.   (SB 116)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

99200.5.

The statewide subject matter projects shall accomplish all of the following goals:

(a) Create opportunities for researchers, higher education faculty, and elementary and secondary school faculty to work together to accomplish all of the following:

(1) Identify exemplary teaching practices.

(2) Examine and develop research on learning, knowledge, and educational materials.

(3) Provide support to teachers to develop and enhance the content knowledge and pedagogical skills necessary to implement State Board of
 Education standards or curriculum frameworks adopted pursuant to Sections 51226, 60605, 60605.1, 60605.2, 60605.3, and 60605.8 and any subsequently adopted standards or curriculum frameworks.

(4) In partnership with the University of California Curriculum Integration Institute or other appropriate entities, provide teachers with support in the implementation of career-oriented, integrated academic and technical courses that meet course requirements for admission to the University of California and the California State University, and align with high-priority industry sectors as determined pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 99200.

(b) Collect the necessary data to perform the evaluation required by subdivision (c) of Section 99200.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 632, Sec. 3.   (SB 612)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to earlier satisfaction of condition in Sec. 8 of Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

99201.

The following subject matter projects shall be authorized pursuant to this chapter:

(a) The California Writing Project.

(b) The California Reading and Literature Project.

(c) The California Mathematics Project.

(d) The California Science Project.

(e) The California History-Social Science Project.

(f) The World History and International Studies Project.

(g) The California Physical Education-Health Project.

(h) The California Arts Project.

(i) The California World Language Project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 632, Sec. 4.   (SB 612)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

99201.5.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the University of California from establishing other subject matter projects in subject areas not specified in Section 99201. However, no funds allocated in the annual Budget Act for the purposes of this chapter shall be used for subject matter projects in subject areas not specified in Section 99201.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 333, Sec. 5.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

99202.

(a) Within each subject matter project, a project advisory board shall be established to do all of the following:

(1) Set guidelines for project sites.

(2) Review and recommend site proposals for funding.

(3) Monitor project activities to ensure that they adequately reflect the priorities of the project and that projects comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(4) Perform other duties as determined by the Concurrence Committee rules and regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of
 Section 99200.

(b) The composition of each advisory board shall be as follows:

(1) One representative selected by the President of the University of California, who is a member of the faculty in the discipline addressed by the project.

(2) One representative selected by the Chancellor of the California State University, who is a member of the faculty in the discipline addressed by the project.

(3) One representative selected by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, who is a classroom teacher in the subject areas addressed by the project.

(4) One representative of the State Board of Education, who is a classroom teacher in the subject areas addressed by the subject.

(5) One representative selected by the Governor.

(6) One representative selected by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(7) One representative of the statewide professional organization of teachers in the subject matter addressed by the project, to be selected by the president of that organization. If there is more than one statewide professional organization of teachers in that subject area, the members of the advisory board may choose which organization shall select the representative and may choose to include a representative of one or more of the other organizations as nonvoting members of the advisory board.

(8) One representative of the California Community Colleges selected by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, who is a
 faculty member in the subject matter area addressed by the project.

(9) One representative of an independent postsecondary institution selected by the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities, who is a member of the faculty in the discipline addressed by the project.

(10) One representative who is from an industry sector that principally utilizes the discipline addressed by the project and who is selected by the advisory board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 632, Sec. 5.   (SB 612)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to earlier satisfaction of condition in Sec. 8 of Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

99203.

The project advisory board of each statewide subject matter project shall use the following criteria in recommending funding for local project sites:

(a) The proposed site is designed to provide support to teachers to develop and enhance the content knowledge and pedagogical skills necessary to implement State Board of Education standards adopted pursuant to Sections 60605 and 60605.8 and any subsequently adopted standards.

(b) The proposed site allocates a minimum of 75 percent of program slots to teachers from schools achieving scores on the state tests administered pursuant to Section 60605, or any successor state assessment system, that
 rank the school in the bottom 40 percent of all California schools or have pupil dropout rates that exceed the statewide average.

(c) The proposed site develops formal partnerships with high-priority schools that achieve scores on the state tests administered pursuant to Section 60605, or any successor state assessment system, that rank the school in the bottom 40 percent of all California schools or have pupil dropout rates that exceed the statewide average.

(d) The proposed site maintains evaluation data as required by subdivision (c) of Section 99200.

(e) The proposed site gives attention to instructional strategies that make use of educational technology to support the instructional program.

(f) The proposed site involves various levels and segments
 of education in a cooperative approach.

(g) Participating school districts, colleges, and universities provide financial and personnel support for the proposed site.

(h) The proposed site uses participants as professional development providers in school districts, colleges, and universities.

(i) The proposed site provides continuing professional development to project participants.

(j) The proposed site addresses the need to integrate existing standards of competence in the subject matter into the curriculum at the grade level taught by each participating teacher.

(k) The proposed site contributes to the effectiveness of school and district development plans and coordinates with existing
 agencies or entities, such as the resource agency or consortia established pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 44680) of Chapter 3.1 of Part 25.

(l) Neighboring institutions have worked collaboratively to develop a proposal that clearly indicates their intention to continue to work cooperatively throughout the duration of the local project.

(m) For purposes of recommending funding for local project sites that serve middle or high school teachers, the project advisory board shall give special consideration to sites that utilize or are preparing to utilize instructional strategies to deliver career-oriented, integrated academic and technical content.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 632, Sec. 6.   (SB 612)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to earlier satisfaction of condition in Sec. 8 of Ch. 632.)
-------------------------------------------

99204.

This chapter shall be operative, and shall apply to the University of California, only for such times as the Legislature has appropriated funds therefor and the Regents of the University of California have accepted the funds. No provision of this chapter shall apply to the University of California unless the Regents of the University of California, by resolution, makes that provision applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1362, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. California Professional Development Institutes [99220. - 99227.]

99220.

The Regents of the University of California are requested to jointly develop with the Trustees of California State University and the independent colleges and universities, the California Reading Professional Development Institutes, to be administered by the university, in partnership with the California State University and with private, independent universities in California, in accordance with all of the following criteria:

(a) (1) In June 1999, the University of California and its institutes’ partners shall commence instruction for 6,000 participants who either provide direct instruction in reading to pupils in kindergarten or in grade 1, 2, or 3, or who supervise beginning teachers of reading. Commencing in July 2000, the institutes shall provide instruction for an additional 14,000 participants who either provide direct instruction in reading to pupils, including special education pupils, in prekindergarten, kindergarten or in grade 1, 2, or 3, or supervise beginning teachers of reading. Of the 14,000 new positions, at least 2,000 shall be reserved for prekindergarten teachers who teach in state preschool programs located in the attendance area of high-priority schools in order to link prekindergarten literacy development and reading readiness to the state’s reading goals for pupils enrolled in kindergarten and grades 1 to 3, inclusive. If there are not enough applicants to fill the 2,000 positions, the remaining positions may be filled by teachers of pupils enrolled in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 3, inclusive.

(2) Ongoing support for second-year participants shall include a second-year institute focusing on the use of instructional materials, leveraging of school district resources, and the development of teacher leadership within the school district to improve pupil achievement in reading.

(b) (1) The institutes shall provide instruction for school teams from each participating school. These school teams may include both beginning and experienced teachers and the schoolsite administrator, with the majority of the team composed of beginning teachers.

(2) Criteria and priority for selection of participating school teams shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Schools whose pupils’ reading scores are at or below the 40th percentile on the reading portion of the achievement test authorized by Section 60640.

(B) Schools with a high number of beginning and noncredentialed teachers.

(C) Schools with high poverty levels, as determined by the percentage of pupils eligible for free or reduced price meals.

(D) Schools with a full complement of team members as outlined above.

(E) School teams committed to participate in the Elementary School Intensive Reading Program established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 53025) of Chapter 16 of Part 28 for a minimum of three years.

(F) Schools that have adopted standards-based materials approved by the State Board of Education.

(3) In any fiscal year, if funding is inadequate to accommodate the participation of all eligible school teams, first priority shall be given to schools meeting the criteria set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(c) (1) The institutes shall provide instruction in the teaching of reading in a manner consistent with the standard for a comprehensive reading instruction program that is research-based, as described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259, and shall include all of the following components:

(A) The study of organized, systematic, explicit skills including phonemic awareness, direct, systematic explicit phonics, and decoding skills.

(B) A strong literature, language and comprehension component with a balance of oral and written language.

(C) Ongoing diagnostic techniques that inform teaching and assessment.

(D) Early intervention techniques.

(2) Instruction provided pursuant to this section shall be consistent with state-adopted academic content standards and with the curriculum framework on reading/language arts adopted by the State Board of Education.

(3) Instruction provided pursuant to this section shall acquaint teachers with the value in the diagnostic nature of standardized tests.

(d) (1) Each participant who satisfactorily completes an institute authorized by this section shall receive a stipend, commensurate with the duration of the institute, of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), as determined by the University of California.

(2) A participant in an institute authorized by this section who satisfactorily completes additional institute activities or leadership and mentoring responsibilities in his or her school in subsequent years in accordance with institute guidelines shall receive a stipend, commensurate with the participant’s responsibilities, of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), as determined by the University of California. It is the intent of the Legislature that stipends paid to participants under this paragraph average approximately one thousand dollars ($1,000) per stipend recipient per year.

(e) In order to provide maximum access, the institutes shall be offered through multiple university and college campuses that are widely distributed throughout the state or in a regionally accredited program offered through instructor-led, interactive online courses. In order to maximize access to teachers and administrators who may be precluded from participating in an onsite institute due to geographical, physical, or time constraints, each institute shall be required to accommodate at least 5 percent of the participants through state-approved instructor-led, interactive online courses. Instruction at the institutes shall consist of an intensive, sustained training period of no less than 40 hours nor more than 120 hours during the summer or during an intersession break or an equivalent instructor-led, online course, and shall be supplemented, during the following school year, with no fewer than 80 additional hours nor more than 120 additional hours of instruction and schoolsite meetings, held on at least a monthly basis, to focus on the academic progress of that school’s pupils in reading.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that a local education agency or postsecondary institution that offers an accredited program of professional preparation consider providing partial and proportional credit toward satisfaction of reading course requirements to an enrolled candidate who satisfactorily completes a California Reading Professional Development Institute program if the institute has been certified by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing as meeting reading preparation standards.

(g) This section does not prohibit a participant from attending an institute authorized by this section in more than one academic year.

(h) “Beginning teachers,” for purposes of this article, are teachers with three or fewer years of teaching experience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 91, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

99221.

The Regents of the University of California are requested to develop jointly with the Trustees of the California State University and the independent colleges and universities, the High School English Professional Development Institutes, to be administered by the university, in partnership with the California State University and with private, independent universities in California, in accordance with all of the following criteria:

(a) In July 2000, the University of California and its institutes’ partners shall commence instruction for 12,000 participants who either provide direct instruction in reading and writing to California public high school pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, or supervise beginning teachers of high school reading and writing.

(b) (1) The institutes shall provide instruction for school teams from each participating school. These school teams may include both beginning and experienced teachers and the schoolsite administrator.

(2) Criteria and priority for selection of participating school teams shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Schools whose pupils’ scores on the English language arts portion of the achievement test authorized by Section 60640 are at or below the 40th percentile.

(B) Teams composed of a large percentage of the members of their schools’ English departments, which may include the chair of that department.

(C) Schools with high poverty levels, as determined by the percentage of pupils eligible for free or reduced price meals.

(D) Teams of teachers from various departments within a school.

(E) Schools with a high number of beginning and noncredentialed teachers.

(F) Schools that have adopted standards-based materials approved by the State Board of Education.

(3) In any fiscal year, if funding is inadequate to accommodate the participation of all eligible school teams, first priority shall be given to schools meeting the criteria set forth in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2).

(c) (1) The institutes shall provide instruction in the teaching of reading and writing in a manner consistent with the standard for a comprehensive reading and writing instruction program that is research-based, as described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 44259.

(2) Instruction provided pursuant to this section shall be consistent with state-adopted academic content standards and with the curriculum frameworks on reading/language arts for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that are adopted by the State Board of Education.

(3) Instruction provided pursuant to this section shall acquaint teachers with the value in the diagnostic nature of standardized tests.

(d) In order to provide maximum access, the institutes shall be offered through multiple university and college campuses that are widely distributed throughout the state or in a regionally accredited program offered through instructor-led, interactive online courses. In order to maximize access to teachers and administrators who may be precluded from participating in an onsite institute due to geographical, physical, or time constraints, each institute shall be required to accommodate at least 5 percent of the participants through state-approved instructor-led, interactive online courses. Instruction at the institutes shall consist of an intensive, sustained training period of no less than 40 hours nor more than 120 hours during the summer or during an intersession break or an equivalent instructor-led, online course and shall be supplemented, during the following school year, with no fewer than 80 additional hours nor more than 120 additional hours of instruction and schoolsite meetings, held on at least a monthly basis, to focus on the academic progress of that school’s pupils in English language arts.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that a local education agency or postsecondary institution that offers an accredited program of professional preparation consider providing partial and proportional credit toward satisfaction of English language arts requirements to an enrolled candidate who satisfactorily completes a High School English Professional Development Institute if the institute has been certified by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing as meeting English language arts standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 737, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

99221.5.

(a) The Regents of the University of California are requested to authorize the President of the University of California or his or her designee to jointly develop English Language Development Professional Institutes with the Chancellor of the California State University, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the independent colleges and universities, and the Superintendent, or their designees. In order to provide maximum access, the institutes shall be offered at sites widely distributed throughout the state, which shall include programs offered through instructor-led, interactive online courses, in accordance with existing state law. In order to maximize access to teachers and administrators who may be precluded from participating in an onsite institute due to
 geographical, physical, or time constraints, each institute shall accommodate at least 5 percent of the participants through existing state-approved online instructor-led courses, programs, or both. The California subject matter projects, an intersegmental, discipline-based professional development network administered by the University of California, is requested to be the organizing entity for the institutes and followup programs.

(b) (1) The institutes shall provide instruction for school teams from each school participating in the program established pursuant to this section. The institutes may provide instruction for school teams serving English language learners in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive. A school team shall include teachers who do not hold crosscultural or bilingual-crosscultural certificates or their equivalents, teachers who hold those certificates or their equivalents, and a schoolsite
 administrator. The majority of the team shall be teachers who do not hold those crosscultural certificates or their equivalents. If the participating school team employs instructional assistants who provide instructional services to English language learners, the team may include these instructional assistants.

(2) Commencing in July 2000, the English Language Professional Development Institutes shall provide instruction to an additional 10,000 participants. These participants shall be in addition to the 5,000 participants authorized as of January 1, 2000. Commencing July 2001, and each fiscal year thereafter, the number of participants receiving instruction through the English Language Development Professional Institutes shall be specified in the annual Budget Act.

(3) Criteria and priority for selection of participating school teams shall include, but not necessarily be limited
 to, all of the following:

(A) Schools whose pupils’ reading scores are at or below the 40th percentile on the English language arts portion of the achievement test authorized by Section 60640.

(B) Schools in which a high percentage of pupils score below grade level on the English language development assessment authorized by Section 60810, when it is developed.

(C) Schools with a high number of new, underprepared, and noncredentialed teachers. Underprepared teachers shall be defined as teachers who do not possess a crosscultural or bilingual-crosscultural certificate, or their equivalents.

(D) Schools in which the enrollment of English language learners exceeds 25 percent of the total school enrollment.

(E) Schools with a full complement of team members as described in paragraph (1).
